District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Medical Cannabis Retailer Craft Preparation Endorsement Amendment
Act of 2025".
Sec. 2. The Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative of 1999, effective
February 25, 2010 (D.C. Law 13-315; D.C. Official Code§ 7-1671.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.01) is amended by adding a new paragraph
(15B) to read as follows:
"(15B) "Preroll" means a cigarette containing raw or dried cannabis flower or
other material from the cannabis plant wrapped in rolling paper or other material.
(b) A new section 7g is added to read as follows:
"Sec. 7g. Craft preparation endorsement.
"(a) A holder of a retailer license shall be eligible to apply to the ABC Board for a craft
preparation endorsement.

“(b) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement may prepare the following types of
medical cannabis products at their licensed premises for sale to qualifying patients and
caregivers:
“(1) Baked goods, beverages, chocolates, confections, and other edibles, provided
that the cannabis products are made using cannabis oil, butter, or from other products purchased
from a licensed manufacturer;
“(2) Lotions, soaps, ointments, and other products intended to be applied to the
skin; and
“(3) Prerolls.
“(c)(1) Medical cannabis products prepared under a craft preparation endorsement shall
be prepared, tested, packaged, and labeled in accordance with the requirements of this act and
rules issued by the Mayor.
“(2) All medical cannabis product prepared under a craft preparation endorsement
shall be shelf-stable and shall not require refrigeration to avoid spoilation.
“(3) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement shall not prepare or manufacture
transdermal patches.
“(d)(1) Medical cannabis products prepared under a craft preparation endorsement may
be sold only to qualifying patients and their caregivers.
“(2) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement that also holds a delivery
endorsement may deliver medical cannabis products prepared under the endorsement to
qualifying patients and their caregivers.
“(3) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement shall not distribute or sell
medical cannabis products to retailers, internet retailers, manufacturers, or unlicensed


establishments or other persons and entities engaged in the resale, direct sale, or wholesale of the
product.”.
“(e) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement may devote no more than 20% of the
gross floor area of its licensed premises to the preparation of medical cannabis products.
“(f)(1) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement may store no more than 2 kilograms
of medical cannabis flower and no more than 1 liter combined of cannabis oil and tincture for the
purpose of preparing medical cannabis products.
“(2)(A) Cannabis flower stored pursuant to this subsection shall be sourced only
from licensed cultivation centers.
“(B) Cannabis oil or tincture stored pursuant to this subsection shall be
sourced only from licensed manufacturers.
“(g) In the preparation of medical cannabis products, a holder of a craft preparation
endorsement shall not extract cannabinoids from cannabis plant material or use butane or
explosive gas.
“(h) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement shall not prepare, sell, or distribute
medical cannabis products that are not prepared, tested, packaged, and labeled in accordance
with the requirements of this act and rules issued by the Mayor.
“(i) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement shall not permit odor, smoke, or by-
products from its preparation of medical cannabis products to be detectable by sense of smell in a
separate residence or property, whether located on the same lot as the holder’s licensed premises
or a separate lot.


“(j) A holder of a craft preparation endorsement shall not permit the consumption or use
of medical cannabis products at its licensed premises unless it holds a safe-use treatment facility
endorsement for the licensed premises where the consumption or use will occur.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).


GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Megan D. Browder
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: October 1, 2024
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review – Draft “Medical Cannabis Retailer Craft Preparation
Endorsement Act of 2024”
(AE-24-451)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
this Office has reviewed the above-referenced draft
legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this regard, please do
not hesitate to call me at (202) 724-5524.
_________________________________
Megan D. Browder